Arkansas, session 2025, HB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-12-120, concerning retirement benefits
for city attorneys in cities of the first class and cities of the second
class, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) Upon the death of a city attorney who retired under the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section or a city attorney who dies in
office after becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section
or any other state statute, the legally recognized spouse of the city
attorney married to the city attorney for ten (10) years or longer may
receive, at the option of the governing body of the city:
(A) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the retired
city attorney was receiving; or
(B) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the city
attorney who died in office was entitled to receive.
*LJH106*
01/28/2025 8:28:49 AM LJH106

HB1276
(2) Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-12-122, concerning retirement benefits
for deputy city clerks in cities of the first class, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Upon the death of a deputy city clerk who retired under the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section or a deputy city clerk who dies
in office after becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this
section or any other state statute, the legally recognized spouse of the
deputy city clerk married to the deputy city clerk for ten (10) years or
longer may receive, at the option of the governing body of the city:
(A) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the retired
deputy city clerk was receiving; or
(B) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the deputy
city clerk who died in office was entitled to receive.
(2) Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-12-124, concerning retirement benefits
for mayors in cities of the second class, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) Upon the death of a mayor who retired under the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section or a mayor who dies in office after becoming
eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section or any other state
statute, the legally recognized spouse of the mayor married to the mayor for
ten (10) years or longer may receive, at the option of the governing body of
the city:
(A) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the retired
mayor was receiving; or
(B) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the mayor who
died in office was entitled to receive.
(2) Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-12-125, concerning retirement benefits
for treasurers in cities of the first class, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Upon the death of a treasurer who retired under the provisions
01/28/2025 8:28:49 AM LJH106

HB1276
of subsection (a) of this section or a treasurer who dies in office after
becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section or any other
state statute, the legally recognized spouse of the treasurer married to the
treasurer for ten (10) years or longer may receive, at the option of the
governing body of the city:
(A) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the retired
treasurer was receiving; or
(B) One-half (1/2) of the retirement benefit the treasurer
who died in office was entitled to receive.
(2) Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.


























01/28/2025 8:28:49 AM LJH106